Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Employment of Recreational Supervisors and Purchase of Recreational Equipment in Certain Counties

§ 55-9-51.
General grant of authority.

The board of supervisors of any county having a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000) inhabitants, according to the latest federal census, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to employ recreational supervisors for public parks and/or playgrounds located in said county, to pay to each recreational supervisor a salary of three hundred dollars ($300.00) per month, and to expend a sum not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) annually for the purchase and installation of recreational equipment in such public parks and/or playgrounds. However, no sum in excess of two thousand, five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) shall be expended for the purchase and installation of recreational equipment in any one (1) supervisors district in any one (1) year.

The board of supervisors of any county having as many as seven (7) municipalities located therein, in whole or in part, and in which there is located a Natchez Trace Parkway Housing Authority and a government fish hatchery, may, in its discretion, employ recreational supervisors for public parks and/or playgrounds located in said county, expend a total sum not exceeding three thousand, six hundred dollars ($3,600.00) annually for their salaries and expenses, and expend a sum not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) annually for the purchase and installation of recreational equipment in such parks and/or playgrounds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 296, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 201, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 210, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 202; Laws, 1962, ch. 209.

§ 55-9-53.
County recreational commission.

The board of supervisors of any county specified in Section 55-9-51(1) may, in its discretion, create, by resolution spread at large upon its minutes, a commission to be known as the county recreational commission with authority to study the recreational needs of the youth of the county and to recommend to said board the most appropriate expenditure of funds authorized to be expended in said section. Any such commission shall be composed of fifteen (15) members, three (3) members to be appointed from each supervisor’s district within the county, who shall be residents of the county and appointed by the board for a term of four (4) years; provided, that one (1) member from each district shall be appointed for an initial term of two (2) years, one (1) member from each district shall be appointed for an initial term of three (3) years, and one (1) member from each district shall be appointed for an initial term of four (4) years. All appointments thereafter shall be for a term of four (4) years. All members of the commission shall serve without pay.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 296, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 201, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 210, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 202; Laws, 1962, ch. 209; Laws, 1975, ch. 335, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1975).

§ 55-9-55.
Cooperation with municipalities.

The boards of supervisors specified in Section 55-9-51 are authorized to work in conjunction with the various municipalities in carrying out the provisions of Sections 55-9-51 through 55-9-57.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 296, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 201, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 210, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 202; Laws, 1962, ch. 209.

§ 55-9-57.
Payment of expenditures.

All monies authorized to be expended under the provisions of Sections 55-9-51 through 55-9-57 shall be paid from the general fund of such counties affected thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 296, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 201, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 210, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 202; Laws, 1962, ch. 209.